Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Penalties

149.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS 149.040 shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500), or confined in jail for not less than thirty (30) nor more than one hundred (100) days, or both.

Any physically able resident of this state above the age of eighteen (18) who refuses or neglects to assist in extinguishing forest fires, when summoned by a warden as authorized by KRS 149.090(2), and any person who refuses to allow the use of required equipment or materials authorized by KRS 149.090(3), shall be fined not less than fifty ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who violates KRS 149.083 shall be fined not less than one hundred ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not less than ninety (90) days nor more than twelve (12) months, or both.

History.
2007i-26, 2007j-3: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 203, § 4; 1960, ch. 94, § 2; 1964, ch. 158, § 21; 1966, ch. 23, §§ 50, 51 (2); 1982, ch. 142, § 15, effective July 15, 1982.

149.991.
Penalties for violation of KRS 149.360 to 149.430.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 149.360 to 149.430 except KRS 149.380 shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 149.380 shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 158, § 18; 1982, ch. 142, § 16, effective July 15, 1982.